Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 1

Equalization Board

6-34-101. Establishment.

The council shall establish an equalization board, and shall appoint each year three (3) persons who are property owners and qualified voters of the city for a one-year term.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.05; T.C.A., § 6-3402.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

6-34-102. Powers and compensation.

The equalization board may increase assessments made, and may add assessments omitted by the city assessing officer, but it may decrease individual assessments or strike erroneous assessments from the assessment roll only on appeals from interested parties. It may increase or decrease the assessment of all property or of any class of property by a uniform percentage, in which case the requirement of notice and hearing shall not apply, but a notice of such blanket increase or decrease shall be inserted once in the official city newspaper.

The members of the board may receive such compensation on a per diem basis for each day of duty as provided by ordinance.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.06; T.C.A., § 6-3403.

6-34-103. Sessions.

The equalization board shall begin and end its work at times to be prescribed by ordinance, which times shall be so established that the assessment roll may be completed and tax bills may be prepared before the tax due date.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.07; T.C.A., § 6-3404.

6-34-104. Reports to council.

The equalization board, upon completion of its work, shall submit a written report to the council, including total increases and decreases made by it and the final total assessment of each class of property.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 6.08; T.C.A., § 6-3405.